Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Legislative Assembly finds that:
(a) Oregon offshore wind holds tremendous potential and promise  for this state to di-
versify its energy portfolio.
(b) Oregon has an opportunity to participate in a  growing global market by contributing
to the development of the nascent offshore wind energy supply chain.
(c) An intergovernmental task force led by  the Bureau of Ocean Energy Management has
reengaged and is expected to  reveal offshore wind call areas in 2021 for the development of
floating offshore wind energy within the federal waters off the Oregon coast.
(d) Oregon has an opportunity to participate  in holistic west coast planning for the
strategic integration of floating offshore wind energy within the next decade and to position
itself for potential market expansion thereafter.
(e) The Department of Land Conservation and Development has an established  role as
the lead state agency coordinating with the  federal process for floating offshore wind devel-
opment and, as the lead agency of the federally approved Oregon Coastal Management Pro-
gram, the department implements the state’s federal consistency authority pursuant  to the
Coastal Zone Management Act of 1972  and associated federal regulations. The department
implements federal consistency  review by evaluating federal activities for compliance with
state enforceable policies and their reasonably foreseeable effects to  coastal uses and re-
sources of the Oregon coastal zone, and the department will coordinate with networked
agency and local government partners to evaluate floating  offshore wind development activ-
ities for consistency with the Oregon Coastal Management Program.
(f) The Oregon Business Development Department  has established a leadership role in
facilitating attracting the floating  offshore wind energy industry to this state and in facili-
tating floating offshore wind energy supply chain development.
(g) Understanding the impacts, benefits, opportunities and barriers of  floating offshore
wind energy with respect to Oregon’s fishing communities, ocean  and shore-side recreational
users, tribes, ports,  coastal ecosystems, natural resources, manufacturing industry, mari-
time sector,  disaster recovery planning, workforce development and electricity ratepayers
Enrolled House Bill 3375 (HB 3375-A) Page 2
can maximize the benefits to this state,  while minimizing the conflicts between floating off-
shore wind energy, the ocean ecosystem and ocean users.
(h) Defining a pathway for Oregon to take advantage  to the fullest extent possible of the
federal offshore wind investment tax credit and other federal infrastructure investment
programs that could benefit Oregon’s ports and transmission system  can facilitate immedi-
ate economic investments as well as long term ratepayer savings.
(i) Understanding the feasibility of using offshore wind as a clean  power source for the
future in-state generation  of renewable fuel such as renewable hydrogen will strengthen
state and regional energy decarbonization planning scenarios.
(j) Investigating potential mechanisms to integrate floating offshore wind energy  into
Oregon’s future energy mix will strengthen state and regional energy decarbonization strat-
egies.
(2) In furtherance of the findings set  forth in subsection (1) of this section, the Legisla-
tive Assembly finds and declares that:
(a) It is the goal of this state to plan for the development  of up to three gigawatts of
floating offshore wind energy projects within the federal  waters off the Oregon coast by 2030;
(b) It is further the goal  of this state that the planning described in this subsection be
conducted in  a manner that will maximize benefits to this state while minimizing conflicts
between floating offshore wind energy, the ocean ecosystem and ocean users; and
(c) Consistent  with applicable federal law, it shall be the policy position of the State of
Oregon that:
(A) Any federal planning or permitting process for offshore energy research and devel-
opment in federal waters off the Oregon coast and for  any related transmission and other
facilities, particularly those  that transverse Oregon’s territorial sea, shall adequately con-
sider the prompt decommissioning of any offshore facility after permanent cessation of  use
of the facility; and
(B) Adequate consideration as described  in this paragraph must include consideration of
the removal or decommissioning of anchors, cables and any other equipment related  to the
facility in a manner that will serve to avoid future conflicts between the  equipment and
fishing operations conducted by persons who hold licenses issued pursuant to the commercial
fishing laws.
SECTION 2.
(1) The State Department of Energy shall conduct a literature review on  the
benefits and challenges of integrating up to three gigawatts of floating offshore wind  energy
into Oregon’s electric grid by 2030.
(2) In addition to conducting the literature review required by  this section, the State
Department of Energy shall:
(a) Gather input and consult with other interested or appropriate state,  regional and
national entities, including but not limited to the Department of Land Conservation and  De-
velopment, the Oregon  Business Development Department, the State Department of Fish and
Wildlife, the  Public Utility Commission, the Northwest Power and Conservation Council, the
Bonneville Power Administration, the Bureau  of Ocean Energy Management, the National
Renewable Energy Laboratory, the United States Department  of Defense and the Pacific
Northwest National Laboratory, on the effects, including  benefits and challenges, of inte-
grating up to three gigawatts of floating offshore wind energy on  reliability, state renewable
energy goals, jobs, equity and resilience; and
(b) Hold no less than two public remote meetings with interested stakeholders to provide
a summary of the literature review and consultation required by this section and to  gather
feedback from  stakeholders on the benefits and challenges of integrating up to three
gigawatts of floating offshore wind energy into Oregon’s electric grid.
(3) The State Department of  Energy shall provide a summary of the key findings from
the literature review  and consultation required by this section, including opportunities for
future study and engagement, in a  report and in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, to the
Enrolled House Bill 3375 (HB 3375-A) Page 3
appropriate interim committees of the Legislative  Assembly no later than September 15,
2022.
SECTION 3. Section 2 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2023.
SECTION 4. This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House April 27, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 8, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3375 (HB 3375-A) Page 4